Hawaii statutes.
§612-57 Grand jury counsel; duties.
The grand jury counsel shall serve, upon request of the grand jury, as
independent legal counsel to the grand jury, to be at the call of the grand
jury during its proceedings in obtaining appropriate advice on matters of law
after the grand jury has been sworn and charged by the court under section
612-16(d) and during the court's absence. The grand jury counsel may be
present during grand jury proceedings, and if not present in the building shall
be in the immediate vicinity to the building in which the grand jury meets, so
that counsel will be readily available to the grand jury, but shall not
participate in the questioning of the witnesses or the prosecution. The grand
jury counsel's function shall be only to receive inquiries on matters of law
sought by the grand jury, conduct legal research, and provide appropriate
answers of law. [L 1980, c 209, §8; am L 1982, c 101, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next